Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-419
Hunting, fishing, or fur-harvesting permit; person stationed in Nebraska in military service; certain students; resident permit.

(1) Any person in the military service of the United States, regardless of residence, who has been ordered to active duty at any facility of the Department of Defense or its component services located in the State of Nebraska, may hunt, fish, or harvest fur on the appropriate resident permit upon satisfactory proof that such person has been actually present for duty at such facility for a period of thirty days or more.

(2) Any person enrolled and in actual attendance as a full-time student in any university, college, junior college, or vocational-technical college in this state, regardless of residence, or any high school foreign exchange student in this state, may hunt or fish on the appropriate resident permit upon satisfactory proof that such person has been actually in attendance at any such institution for a period of thirty days or more or is a high school foreign exchange student.

Laws 1951, c. 107, § 1, p. 515;

Laws 1957, c. 139, § 6, p. 467;

Laws 1959, c. 150, § 5, p. 572;

Laws 1967, c. 216, § 6, p. 583;

Laws 1969, c. 291, § 1, p. 1062;

Laws 1972, LB 1057, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 72, § 10;

Laws 1983, LB 104, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-214.01;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 129.